Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14G-107]
Disapproval of filings. (a) If, within the waiting period or any
extension of the waiting period as provided in section 431:14G-105, the
commissioner finds that a filing does not meet the requirements of this
article, the commissioner shall send to the managed care plan that made the
filing, written notice of disapproval of the filing specifying in what respects
the filing fails to meet the requirements of this article, specifying
the actuarial, statutory, and regulatory basis for the disapproval, including
an explanation of the application thereof that resulted in disapproval, and stating that the filing shall not become
effective.

(b)
Whenever a managed care plan has no legally effective rates as a result of the
commissioner's disapproval of rates, a finding pursuant to subsection
(c) that a filing is no longer effective,
or other act, interim rates shall be established within ten days of
disapproval, or other act, as follows:

(1) The
commissioner shall specify interim rates sufficient to protect the interests of
the managed care plan and its enrollees, ensure the solvency of the managed
care plan, maintain the plan's health care delivery, and prevent any impairment
of enrollees' health care benefits. When a new rate becomes legally effective
and the new rate is higher than the interim rate, the commissioner shall allow
the managed care plan to retroactively adjust the premiums to the time when the
interim rate was first imposed. If the new rate is lower than the interim
rate, the commissioner may order that the difference be applied to stabilize
future rates or be refunded to current enrollees of the managed care plan;

(2) If a filing
is disapproved, in whole or in part, a petition and demand for a contested case
hearing may be filed in accordance with chapter 91. The managed care plan
shall have the burden of proving that the disapproval is not justified; or

(3) If a filing
is approved, a contested case hearing in accordance with chapter 91 may be
convened pursuant to subsection (c) to determine if the approved rates comply
with the requirements of this article. If an appeal is taken from the
commissioner's approval or if subsequent to the approval the commissioner
convenes a hearing pursuant to subsection (c), the filing of the appeal or the
commissioner's notice of hearing shall not stay the implementation of the rates
approved by the commissioner, or the rates currently in effect, whichever is
higher.

(c) If at
any time subsequent to the applicable review period provided for in section
431:14G-105, the commissioner finds that a filing does not comply with the
requirements of this article, the commissioner shall order a hearing upon the
filing. The hearing shall be held upon not less than ten days' written notice
to every managed care plan that made such a filing. The notice shall specify
the matters to be considered at the hearing and state the specific
factual and legal grounds to support the commissioner's finding of
noncompliance. If, after a hearing the
commissioner finds that a filing does not meet the requirements of this
article, the commissioner within
thirty days of the hearing, shall issue an
order specifying in what respects the filing fails to meet the requirements,
and stating when, within a reasonable period thereafter, the filing shall be
deemed no longer effective. Copies of the order shall be sent to each managed
care plan whose rates are affected by the order. The order shall not affect any contract or policy made or issued prior
to the expiration of the period set forth in the order.

(d)(1) Any enrollee
of a managed care plan or organization that
purchases health insurance from a managed care plan aggrieved with respect to any filing that is in effect may make a
written demand to the commissioner for a hearing thereon; provided that the
managed care plan that made the filing shall not be authorized to proceed under
this subsection;

(2) The demand
shall specify the grounds to be relied upon by the aggrieved enrollee or
organization and the demand shall show that the enrollee or organization has a
specific economic interest affected by the filing;

(3) If the
commissioner finds that:

(A) The
demand is made in good faith;

(B) The
applicant would be so aggrieved if the enrollee's or organization's grounds are
established; and

(C) The
grounds otherwise justify a hearing;

the commissioner, within thirty days after
receipt ofthe demand, shall hold a hearing. The hearing shall be held upon not
less than ten days' written notice to the aggrieved party and to every managed
care plan that made the filing. The aggrieved party shall bear the burden of
proving that the filing fails to meet the standards set forth in section
431:14G-103; and

(4) If, after the
hearing, the commissioner finds that the filing does not meet the requirements
of this article, the commissioner shall issue an order specifying in what
respects the filing fails to meet the requirements of this article, and stating
when, within a reasonable period, the filing shall be deemed no longer effective.
Copies of the order shall be sent to the applicant and to every affected
managed care plan. The order shall not affect any contract or policy made or
issued prior to the expiration of the period set forth in the order.

(e) The
notices, hearings, orders, and appeals referred to in this section, in all
applicable respects, shall be subject to chapter 91, unless expressly provided
otherwise. [L 2007, c 175, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next